North Carolina, session 2025, SB726.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Of the funds appropriated from the Highway Fund to the Department
of Transportation for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the sum of nine million five hundred thousand
dollars ($9,500,000) in nonrecurring funds shall be used for the planning and design of the
Westmoreland Road Interchange (Interstate 77 Exit 27) in the Town of Cornelius.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S726-v-1*